Utah statutes.
59-2-104.   Situs of property for tax purposes.
(1)  The situs of all taxable property is the tax area where it is located.
(2)  Personal property, unless assessed by the commission, shall be assessed
in the tax area where the owner is domiciled in this state on January 1,
unless the owner demonstrates to the satisfaction of the county assessor that
the personal property is usually kept in a tax area other than that of the
domicile of the owner, in which case that property shall be assessed in the
other tax area.
(3)  Land shall be assessed in parcels or subdivisions not exceeding 640 acres
each, and tracts of land containing more than 640 acres, which have been
sectioned by the United States government, shall be assessed by sections or
fractions of sections.
(4)  The following property shall be listed and assessed in the county where
the property is located:
(a)  public utilities, when operated wholly in one county;
(b)  bridges and ferries which are not public utilities, when operated wholly
in one county;
(c)  electric light lines and similar improvements; and
(d)  canals, ditches, and flumes when separately taxable.
